Maryland, session 2025, HB1448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 23A. ALTERNATIVE NONANIMAL TEST METHODS.
24–23A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1448*

HOUSE BILL 1448
(B) (1) “ALTERNATIVE NONANIMAL TEST METHOD” MEANS A TEST
METHOD THAT:
(I) DOES NOT USE A LIVE VERTEBRATE ANIMAL; AND
(II) PROVIDES INFORMATION OF EQUIVALENT OR BETTER
SCIENTIFIC QUALITY AND RELEVANCE COMPARED TO A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST
METHOD.
(2) “ALTERNATIVE NONANIMAL TEST METHOD” INCLUDES:
(I) COMPUTATIONAL TOXICOLOGY AND BIOINFORMATICS;
(II) HIGH–THROUGHPUT SCREENING METHODS;
(III) TESTING OF CATEGORIES OF CHEMICAL SUBSTANCES;
(IV) TIERED TESTING METHODS;
(V) IN VITRO STUDIES; AND
(VI) MICROPHYSIOLOGICAL SYSTEMS.
(C) “TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD” MEANS A PROCESS,
PROCEDURE, OR EXPERIMENT USING LIVE VERTEBRATE ANIMALS TO:
(1) OBTAIN INFORMATION ON THE CHARACTERISTICS OF A PRODUCT,
INCLUDING:
(I) A CHEMICAL;
(II) AN INGREDIENT;
(III) A DRUG;
(IV) A VACCINE; OR
(V) A PRODUCT FORMULATION; AND
(2) GENERATE INFORMATION REGARDING THE ABILITY OF THE
PRODUCT TO PRODUCE A SPECIFIC BIOLOGICAL EFFECT UNDER SPECIFIED
CONDITIONS.

HOUSE BILL 1448 3
24–23A–02.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO A RESEARCH FACILITY THAT IS LOCATED IN
THE STATE AND REQUIRED TO SUBMIT AN ANIMAL AND PLANT HEALTH
INSPECTION SERVICE FORM 7023, AS DEFINED IN § 24–2301 OF THIS TITLE.
24–23A–03.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY WITH RESPECT TO:
(1) ANIMAL RESEARCH CONDUCTED FOR THE PURPOSES OF
BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH TO INVESTIGATE:
(I) THE BIOLOGICAL PROCESS;
(II) CAUSES OF DISEASE; OR
(III) HOW PROCESSES IN LIVING ORGANISMS DEVELOP AND
FUNCTION; OR
(2) A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD USED TO COMPLY WITH:
(I) THE REQUIREMENTS OF A FEDERAL OR STATE AGENCY; OR
(II) A WRITTEN REQUEST FROM A FEDERAL OR STATE AGENCY
WHEN THE AGENCY HAS EXPRESSLY CONCLUDED THAT A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL
TEST METHOD IS NEEDED TO FULLY ASSESS THE IMPACT ON THE HEALTH OR SAFETY
OF CONSUMERS.
(B) A RESEARCH FACILITY MAY NOT USE A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST
METHOD IF:
(1) AN ALTERNATIVE NONANIMAL TEST METHOD HAS BEEN
APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL OR STATE AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR REGULATING
THE SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR ACTIVITY BEING TESTED; OR
(2) THE FEDERAL OR STATE AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR
REGULATING THE SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR ACTIVITY BEING TESTED HAS MADE
AVAILABLE OR GRANTED A WAIVER FROM USING A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST
METHOD.

HOUSE BILL 1448
(C) IF ALLOWED TO USE A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD, A
RESEARCH FACILITY SHALL:
(1) USE THE FEWEST NUMBER OF ANIMALS POSSIBLE; AND
(2) REDUCE THE LEVEL OF PAIN, SUFFERING, AND STRESS OF THE
ANIMALS USED FOR TESTING.
24–23A–04.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 20 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027,
EACH RESEARCH FACILITY SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
WITH INFORMATION RELATED TO THE TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHODS AND
ALTERNATIVE NONANIMAL TEST METHODS USED BY THE RESEARCH FACILITY IN
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) IF THE RESEARCH FACILITY USED TRADITIONAL ANIMAL
TEST METHODS DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD:
1. A DESCRIPTION OF EACH TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST
METHOD USED AND THE REASON THE TEST METHOD WAS REQUIRED; AND
2. THE NUMBER AND SPECIES OF ANIMAL USED; AND
(II) IF THE RESEARCH FACILITY USED ALTERNATIVE
NONANIMAL TEST METHODS DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD:
1. THE TYPES AND NUMBER OF ALTERNATIVE
NONANIMAL TEST METHODS USED; AND
2. THE NUMBER OF WAIVERS RECEIVED BY THE
RESEARCH FACILITY UNDER § 24–23A–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 20 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL MAKE THE INFORMATION SUBMITTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION PUBLICLY AVAILABLE.
24–23A–05.
(A) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1448 5
(B) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PETITION THE CIRCUIT COURT TO:
(1) ISSUE AN ORDER RESTRAINING OR ENJOINING A VIOLATION OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) GRANT ANY OTHER RELIEF THAT THE COURT DETERMINES IS
NECESSARY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.